Nebraska, session 109, LB159.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB159 LB159
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 29-2260, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
29-2260 (1) Whenever a person is adjudicated to be as described in
subdivision (1), (2), (3)(b), or (4) of section 43-247, his or her
disposition shall be governed by the Nebraska Juvenile Code.
(2) Whenever a court considers sentence for an offender convicted of
either a misdemeanor or a felony for which mandatory or mandatory minimum
imprisonment is not specifically required, the court may withhold
sentence of imprisonment unless, having regard to the nature and
circumstances of the crime and the history, character, and condition of
the offender, the court finds that imprisonment of the offender is
necessary for protection of the public because:
(a) The risk is substantial that during the period of probation the
offender will engage in additional criminal conduct;
(b) The offender is in need of correctional treatment that can be
provided most effectively by commitment to a correctional facility; or
(c) A lesser sentence will depreciate the seriousness of the
offender's crime or promote disrespect for law.
(3) The following grounds, while not controlling the discretion of
the court, shall be accorded weight in favor of withholding sentence of
imprisonment:
(a) The crime neither caused nor threatened serious harm;
(b) The offender did not contemplate that his or her crime would
cause or threaten serious harm;
(c) The offender acted under strong provocation;
(d) Substantial grounds were present tending to excuse or justify
the crime, though failing to establish a defense;
(e) The victim of the crime induced or facilitated commission of the
crime;
(f) The offender has compensated or will compensate the victim of
his or her crime for the damage or injury the victim sustained;
-2-

LB159 LB159
2025 2025
(g) The offender has no history of prior delinquency or criminal
activity and has led a law-abiding life for a substantial period of time
before the commission of the crime;
(h) The crime was the result of circumstances unlikely to recur;
(i) The character and attitudes of the offender indicate that he or
she is unlikely to commit another crime;
(j) The offender is likely to respond affirmatively to probationary
treatment; and
(k) Imprisonment of the offender would entail excessive hardship to
his or her dependents; .
(l) The offender has been abused physically, sexually, or
psychologically by a family or household member as defined in section
42-903, a sexual partner, or a person who used the offender for financial
gain; or
(m) The offender is a trafficking victim as defined in section
28-830.
(4) When an offender who has been convicted of a crime is not
sentenced to imprisonment, the court may sentence him or her to
probation.
Sec. 2. Original section 29-2260, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-3-